Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2294.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 32, chapter 48, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 3, to read: ARTICLE 3. APPRENTICESHIPS START_STATUTE32-4841. Occupational regulating authorities; apprenticeships; examinations; rules A. Notwithstanding any other law, an occupational regulating authority under this title shall establish criteria necessary for granting licenses, certificates or registrations, as appropriate, through apprenticeship programs. The criteria shall provide for the following: 1. An applicant shall complete a United States department of labor-APPROVED or a department of economic security-approved apprenticeship program in the occupational area in which the applicant seeks licensure, certification or registration, either at a school that is LICENSED by this state or by training with a person who is approved by the department of economic security to conduct apprenticeships and who holds the same license, certificate or registration for which the applicant is applying. 2. If the occupational regulating authority requires successful completion of an EXAMINATION for licensure, certification or registration, the applicant must Successfully pass that examination. The passing score on the EXAMINATION may not DISCRIMINATE between an applicant from an apprenticeship program and an applicant from a vocational or trade school. B. An occupational regulating authority may adopt rules to implement this section. END_STATUTE